src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-h20_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Noun - : # h_
    búgv+N+Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef: búgv
    búgv+N+Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef: búgv
    búgv+N+Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef: búgvi
    búgv+N+Neu+Sg+Gen+Indef: bús
    búgv+N+Neu+Pl+Nom+Indef: búgv
    búgv+N+Neu+Pl+Acc+Indef: búgv
    búgv+N+Neu+Pl+Dat+Indef: búgvum
    búgv+N+Neu+Pl+Gen+Indef: búgva
    búgv+N+Neu+Sg+Nom+Def: búgvið
    búgv+N+Neu+Sg+Acc+Def: búgvið
    búgv+N+Neu+Sg+Dat+Def: búnum
    búgv+N+Neu+Sg+Gen+Def: búsins
    búgv+N+Neu+Pl+Nom+Def: búgvini
    búgv+N+Neu+Pl+Acc+Def: búgvini
    búgv+N+Neu+Pl+Dat+Def: búgvunum
    búgv+N+Neu+Pl+Gen+Def: búgvanna
